Utah statutes.
78B-6-516.   Judgment of condemnation -- Recordation -- Effect.

When payments have been made and the bond given, if the plaintiff elects to give one, as required by Sections 78B-6-514 and 78B-6-515, the court shall make a final judgment of condemnation, which shall describe the property condemned and the purpose of the condemnation.  A copy of the judgment shall be filed in the office of the county recorder and the property described in it shall vest in the plaintiff for the purpose specified.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

